Massachusetts, session 194th, S2357.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of Chapter 6C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, the words "fix and revise from time to time
and charge and collect tolls for transit over the metropolitan highway system and the turnpike",
the first time they appear, and inserting in place thereof the following:- “charge and collect tolls
for transit over the metropolitan highway system and the turnpike; said toll rates shall not be
increased from the rates in place on January 1, 2025”.
SECTION 2. Subsection (a) of Section 13 of said Chapter 6C is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 2 the words "fix and revise" and by inserting in place thereof the following:-
“reduce the”.
of 3

SECTION 3. Said subsection (a) of said Section 13 of said Chapter 6C is hereby further
amended by striking out, in lines 5 to 14, inclusive, the words "Such tolls shall be so fixed and
adjusted as to provide, at a minimum, funds sufficient with other revenues, if any, to pay: (i)
costs incurred in furtherance of this chapter related to the turnpike including, but not limited to,
the cost of owning, maintaining, repairing, reconstructing, improving, rehabilitating, policing,
using, administering, controlling and operating the turnpike; and (ii) the principal of, redemption
premium, if any, and the interest on notes or bonds relating to the turnpike as the same shall
become due and payable and to create and maintain reserves established for any of the
department’s corporate purposes.”
SECTION 4. Subsection (b) of said Section 13 of said Chapter 6C is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 44, the words "fix and revise" and by inserting in place thereof the
following:- “reduce the”.
SECTION 5. Said subsection (b) of said Section 13 of said Chapter 6C is hereby further
amended by striking out, in lines 47 to 58, inclusive, the words "Such tolls shall be so fixed and
adjusted as to provide, at a minimum, funds sufficient with other revenues, if any, to pay: (i)
costs incurred in furtherance of this chapter related to the metropolitan highway system
including, but not limited to, the cost of owning, maintaining, repairing, reconstructing,
improving, rehabilitating, policing, using, administering, controlling and operating the turnpike;
and (ii) the principal of, redemption premium, if any, and the interest on notes or bonds relating
to the metropolitan highway system as the same shall become due and payable and to create and
maintain reserves established for any of the department’s corporate purposes.”
of 3

SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall study and report on the feasibility of
establishing all-electric tolling along state and interstate highways of the Commonwealth that are
not currently subject to a toll. The report shall examine the several options available to the
commonwealth to pursue additional tolls, including, but not limited to: (i) placement of all-
electronic tolling gantries on roads in the Commonwealth that are not currently tolled; (ii)
seeking a federal waiver for the placement of border tolls; (iii) reaching interstate or regional
agreements for the placement of additional tolls; and (iv) the commonwealth’s ability to establish
border tolls in the event of proposed changes to federal law on interstate highway tolling. The
department shall file its report along with any legislative recommendations with the house and
senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on transportation on or before
December 31, 2025.
of 3